Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB418.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 403 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
In any proceeding for child custody under this chapter where the court has made a
finding that a party has committed domestic violence and abuse as defined in KRS
403.720 against another party to the proceeding or a child of the parties:
(1) The court shall not remove custody from or reduce the parenting time of the
nonoffending party to whom the child is bonded or attached if the court finds that
the:
(a) Nonoffending party is competent and not abusive; and
(b) Removal would be solely for purposes of improving the relationship between
the child and the offending party;
(2) The court in determining whether to order therapy for purposes of reunification
with an offending party shall consider whether:
(a) There is accepted and scientifically valid proof of the safety, effectiveness,
and therapeutic value of the therapy; and
(b) The therapy is predicated upon cutting off contact between the child and the
nonoffending party; and
(3) Any order to remediate resistance of a child to contact with a violent or abusive
parent shall primarily address the behavior of that parent.
Section 2. KRS 403.270 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) As used in this chapter and KRS 405.020, unless the context requires
otherwise, "de facto custodian" means a person who has been shown by clear
and convincing evidence to have been the primary caregiver for, and financial
supporter of, a child who within the last two (2) years has resided with the
person for an aggregate period of six (6) months or more if the child is under
Page 1 of 10
XXXX 1/12/2026 3:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1124
three (3) years of age and for an aggregate period of one (1) year or more if
the child is three (3) years of age or older or has been placed by the
Department for Community Based Services. Any period of time after a legal
proceeding has been commenced by a parent seeking to regain custody of the
child shall not be included in determining whether the child has resided with
the person for the required minimum period.
(b) A person shall not be a de facto custodian until a court determines by clear
and convincing evidence that the person meets the definition of de facto
custodian established in paragraph (a) of this subsection. Once a court
determines that a person meets the definition of de facto custodian, the court
shall give the person the same standing in custody matters that is given to
each parent under this section and KRS 403.280, 403.340, 403.350, 403.822,
and 405.020.
(2) The court shall determine custody in accordance with the best interests of the child
and equal consideration shall be given to each parent and to any de facto custodian.
Subject to KRS 403.315, there shall be a presumption, rebuttable by a
preponderance of evidence, that joint custody and equally shared parenting time is
in the best interests[interest] of the child. If a deviation from equal parenting time is
warranted, the court shall construct a parenting time schedule which maximizes the
time each parent or de facto custodian has with the child and is consistent with
ensuring the child's welfare. [The court shall consider all relevant factors
including:]
(3) In making a determination of custody, the court shall, prior to consideration of
any other factors enumerated in subsection (4) of this section:
(a) Consider any allegations of:
1. Domestic violence and abuse as defined in KRS 403.720; or
2. An abused or neglected child as defined in KRS 600.020;
Page 2 of 10
XXXX 1/12/2026 3:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1124
committed by one (1) party against another party or a child of the parties;
and
(b) Make written findings on the record as to the impact, if any, of the
allegations described in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph on the child.
(4) The court shall then consider all other factors relevant to the determination of
custody including:
(a) The wishes of the child's parent or parents, and any de facto custodian, as to
his or her custody;
(b) The wishes of the child as to his or her custodian, with due consideration
given to the influence a parent or de facto custodian may have over the child's
wishes;
(c) The interaction and interrelationship of the child with his or her parent or
parents, his or her siblings, and any other person who may significantly affect
the child's best interests;
(d) The motivation of the adults participating in the custody proceeding;
(e) The child's adjustment and continuing proximity to his or her home, school,
and community;
(f) The mental and physical health of all individuals involved;
(g) A finding by the court that domestic violence and abuse, as defined in KRS
403.720, has been committed by one (1) of the parties against a child of the
parties or against another party. The court shall determine the extent to which
the domestic violence and abuse has affected the child and the child's
relationship to each party, with due consideration given to efforts made by a
party toward the completion of any domestic violence treatment, counseling,
or program;
(h) A finding by the court that a party has maliciously made an intentionally
false allegation of child abuse which has no basis in fact and which the
Page 3 of 10
XXXX 1/12/2026 3:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1124
party knew had no basis in fact against another party;
(i)[(h)] The extent to which the child has been cared for, nurtured, and
supported by any de facto custodian;
(j)[(i)] The intent of the parent or parents in placing the child with a de facto
custodian;
(k)[(j)] The circumstances under which the child was placed or allowed to
remain in the custody of a de facto custodian, including whether the parent
now seeking custody was previously prevented from doing so as a result of
domestic violence as defined in KRS 403.720 and whether the child was
placed with a de facto custodian to allow the parent now seeking custody to
seek employment, work, or attend school; and
(l)[(k)] The likelihood a party will allow the child frequent, meaningful, and
continuing contact with the other parent or de facto custodian, except that the
court shall not consider this likelihood if there is a finding that the other
parent or de facto custodian engaged in domestic violence and abuse, as
defined in KRS 403.720, against the party or a child and that a continuing
relationship with the other parent will endanger the health or safety of either
that party or the child.
(5)[(3)] The abandonment of the family residence by a custodial party shall not be
considered where that[said] party was physically harmed or was seriously
threatened with physical harm by his or her spouse, when the[such] harm or threat
of harm was causally related to the abandonment.
(6)[(4)] If the court grants custody to a de facto custodian, the de facto custodian shall
have legal custody under the laws of the Commonwealth.
Section 3. KRS 403.290 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The court may interview the child in chambers to ascertain the child's wishes as to
his or her custodian and as to visitation. The court may permit counsel to be present
Page 4 of 10
XXXX 1/12/2026 3:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1124
at the interview. The court shall cause a record of the interview to be made and to
be part of the record in the case.
(2) The court may seek the advice of professional personnel, whether or not employed
by the court on a regular basis. The advice given shall be in writing and made
available by the court to counsel upon request. Counsel may examine as a witness
any professional personnel consulted by the court.
(3) (a) Paid visitation supervisors and parenting coordinators in a custody
proceeding under this chapter, whether appointed by the court or engaged
by one (1) or more parties, shall document participation training focused on
the following:
1. Early childhood, child, and adolescent development;
2. Dynamics of domestic violence;
3. Effects of domestic violence on adult and child victims;
4. Lethality and risk issues;
5. Model protocols for addressing domestic violence;
6. Available community resources and victim services; and
7. For paid visitation supervisors, the role of the paid supervisor and
ethical principles of supervising visitation.
(b) The training described in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall consist of:
1. Sixteen (16) hours of initial training before the paid visitation
supervisor or parenting coordinator is eligible to provide services to a
party to a custody proceeding; and
2. Eight (8) hours annually thereafter.
Section 4. KRS 403.315 is amended to read as follows:
(1) When determining or modifying a custody order pursuant to KRS 403.270,
403.280, 403.340, or 403.740, the court shall consider the safety and well-being of
the parties and of the children. If a domestic violence order is being or has been
Page 5 of 10
XXXX 1/12/2026 3:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1124
entered against a party by another party or on behalf of a child at issue in the
custody hearing, the presumption that joint custody and equally shared parenting
time is in the best interests[interest] of the child shall not apply as to the party
against whom the domestic violence order is being or has been entered. The court
shall weigh all factors set out in Section 2 of this Act[ KRS 403.270(2)] in
determining the best interests[interest] of the child.
(2) There shall be a presumption, rebuttable by a preponderance of the evidence, that
joint custody and equally shared parenting time is not in the best interests of the
child if the court finds that a party has committed two (2) or more acts of
domestic violence and abuse as defined in KRS 403.720 against another party.
(3) (a) The court shall not make an award of custody or grant unsupervised
visitation with the child to a party who is found to have committed two (2) or
more acts of domestic violence or abuse as defined in KRS 403.720 against
another party unless that party has:
1. Completed:
a. A batterer's intervention program provided by a certified
provider pursuant to 920 KAR 5:020;
b. Parenting classes; and
c. Substance use and mental health assessments and any
recommended corresponding treatments; and
2. Participated in supervised visitation.
(b) Following a party's completion of the requirements in paragraph (a) of this
subsection, the court shall conduct an evidentiary hearing before ordering
unsupervised visitation to that party and a second or subsequent hearing
before awarding custodial rights to that party.
Section 5. KRS 403.727 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any petition filed under KRS 403.725 on behalf of a minor who is alleged to be a
Page 6 of 10
XXXX 1/12/2026 3:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1124
victim of domestic violence and abuse, or in which a minor is named as a
respondent or petitioner, shall comply with the requirements in that section and
shall:
(a) Proceed in accordance with the procedural safeguards under KRS 610.070;
and
(b) Conform to the confidentiality provisions under KRS 610.340.
(2) (a) If the court orders an evidentiary hearing under KRS 403.730(1)(a), a
guardian ad litem shall be appointed for any unrepresented minor who is a
respondent to the action or a petitioner who is an alleged victim of domestic
violence and abuse.
(b) The guardian ad litem shall be paid a fee fixed by the court not to exceed five
hundred dollars ($500), which shall be paid by the Finance and
Administration Cabinet.
(c) The guardian ad litem shall document participation in training on the role
of counsel that includes information on the following:
1. Early childhood, child, and adolescent development;
2. Dynamics of domestic violence;
3. Effects of domestic violence on adult and child victims;
4. Lethality and risk issues;
5. Model protocols for addressing domestic violence; and
6. Available community resources and victims' services.
(3) A victim advocate as defined in KRS 421.570:
(a) Shall be permitted to attend the evidentiary hearing to offer advocacy
services pursuant to KRS 421.575 to the minor petitioner or the adult who
has filed the petition on behalf of the minor; and
(b) Shall not be excluded from the evidentiary hearing unless the:
1. Minor petitioner or adult who has filed the petition on behalf of the
Page 7 of 10
XXXX 1/12/2026 3:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1124
minor declines the services offered; or
2. Court, upon motion and for good cause shown, determines that the
exclusion is in the best interests of the minor petitioner.
(4)[(3)] Violation of the terms or conditions of an order of protection issued under
KRS 403.740 after the person has been served or given notice of the order shall
constitute contempt of court and may constitute a criminal offense pursuant to KRS
403.763 if the offender is an adult or a public offense under KRS 600.020(51) if the
offender is a juvenile. Once a juvenile action or contempt proceeding has been
initiated, the other shall not be undertaken regardless of the outcome of the original
proceeding.
(5)[(4)] Nothing in subsection (4)[(3)] of this section shall preclude the
Commonwealth from proceeding, or the petitioner from pursuing charges, against
the minor respondent for offenses other than a violation of an order of protection.
Proceedings against a minor respondent for offenses other than a violation of an
order of protection shall proceed:
(a) In the juvenile session of District Court; and
(b) In accordance with the procedural and statutory provisions established for the
juvenile session of District Court.
Section 6. KRS 456.035 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any petition filed under KRS 456.030 on behalf of a minor who is an alleged
victim of dating violence and abuse, sexual assault, or stalking, or in which a minor
is named as a respondent or petitioner, shall comply with the requirements in that
section and shall:
(a) Proceed in accordance with the procedural safeguards under KRS 610.070;
and
(b) Conform to the confidentiality provisions under KRS 610.340.
(2) (a) If the court orders an evidentiary hearing under KRS 456.040(1)(a), a
Page 8 of 10
XXXX 1/12/2026 3:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1124
guardian ad litem shall be appointed for any unrepresented minor who is a
respondent to the action or a petitioner who is an alleged victim of dating
violence and abuse, sexual assault, or stalking.
(b) The guardian ad litem shall be paid a fee fixed by the court not to exceed five
hundred dollars ($500), which shall be paid by the Finance and
Administration Cabinet.
(c) The guardian ad litem shall document participation in training on the role
of counsel that includes information on the following:
1. Early childhood, child, and adolescent development;
2. Dynamics of domestic violence;
3. Effects of domestic violence on adult and child victims;
4. Lethality and risk issues;
5. Model protocols for addressing domestic violence; and
6. Available community resources and victims' services.
(3) A victim advocate as defined in KRS 421.570:
(a) Shall be permitted to attend the evidentiary hearing to offer advocacy
services pursuant to KRS 421.575 to the minor petitioner or the adult who
has filed the petition on behalf of the minor; and
(b) Shall not be excluded from the evidentiary hearing unless the:
1. Minor petitioner or adult who has filed the petition on behalf of the
minor declines the services offered; or
2. Court, upon motion and for good cause shown, determines that the
exclusion is in the best interests of the minor petitioner.
(4)[(3)] Violation of the terms or conditions of an order of protection issued under
KRS 456.060 after the person has been served or given notice of the order shall
constitute contempt of court and may constitute a criminal offense pursuant to KRS
456.180 if the offender is an adult or a public offense under KRS 600.020(51) if the
Page 9 of 10
XXXX 1/12/2026 3:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1124
offender is a juvenile. Once a juvenile action or contempt proceeding has been
initiated, the other shall not be undertaken regardless of the outcome of the original
proceeding.
(5)[(4)] Nothing in subsection (4)[(3)] of this section shall preclude the
Commonwealth from proceeding, or the petitioner from pursuing charges, against
the minor respondent for offenses other than a violation of an order of protection.
Proceedings against a minor respondent for offenses other than a violation of an
order of protection shall proceed:
(a) In the juvenile session of District Court; and
(b) In accordance with the procedural and statutory provisions established for the
juvenile session of District Court.
Page 10 of 10
XXXX 1/12/2026 3:30 PM Jacketed